en: Smoke & Carbon Monoxide Detectors
xx: Smoke & Carbon Monoxide Detectors
cs: Detektory kouře a oxidu uhelnatého
da: Røg- og kuliltealarmer
de: Rauch- & Kohlenmonoxidmelder
es: Detectores de humos y monóxido de carbono
fr: Détecteurs de fumée et de dioxyde de carbone
it: Rilevatori di fumo e monossido di carbonio
ja: 煙検知器・一酸化炭素検知器
nl: Rook- en koolmonoxidemelders
no: Røyk- og CO-varsler
pl: Czujniki dymu i dwutlenku węgla
pt: Detectores de fumaça e monóxido de carbono
ru: Детекторы дыма и угарного газа
sv: Rök- och koloxiddetektorer
tr: Duman ve Karbon Monoksit Detektörleri

en: Carbon Monoxide Detectors
xx: Carbon Monoxide Detectors
cs: Detektory oxidu uhelnatého
da: Kuliltedetektorer
de: Kohlenmonoxiddetektoren
es: Detectores de dióxido de carbono
fr: Détecteurs de monoxyde de carbone
it: Rilevatori monossido di carbonio
ja: 一酸化炭素検知器
nl: Koolmonoxidemelders
no: Karbonmonoksid-detektorer
pl: Czujniki dwutlenku węgla
pt: Detectores de monóxido de carbono
ru: Датчики угарного газа
sv: Kolmonoxiddetektorer
tr: Karbonmonoksit Detektörleri

en: Smoke Detectors
xx: Smoke Detectors
cs: Detektory kouře
da: Røgalarmer
de: Rauchmelder
es: Detectores de humo
fr: Détecteurs de fumée
it: Rilevatori di fumo
ja: 煙検知器
nl: Rookmelders
no: Røykvarslere
pl: Czujniki dymu
pt: Detectores de fumaça
ru: Детекторы дыма
sv: Rökdetektorer
tr: Duman Detektörleri

en: Water & Flood Detectors
xx: Water & Flood Detectors
cs: Detektory zaplavení a úniku vody
da: Læksøgere
de: Wassermelder
es: Detectores de fugas
fr: Détecteurs d'eau et d'inondation
it: Rilevatori di perdite o del livello d'acqua
ja: 漏水・浸水検知器
nl: Detectieapparaten voor waterlekken en overstromingen
no: Vann- og lekkasjedetektorer
pl: Wykrywacze wycieków
pt: Detectores de vazamentos
ru: Детекторы утечек воды и затопления
sv: Läckagedetektorer
tr: Su ve Sel Detektörleri

en: Household Appliance Accessories
xx: Household Appliance Accessories
cs: Domácí spotřebiče – příslušenství
da: Husholdningsapparater – tilbehør
de: Haushaltsgeräte-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para electrodomésticos
fr: Accessoires pour appareils électroménagers
it: Accessori elettrodomestici
ja: 家電関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor huishoudelijke apparaten
no: Tilbehør til husholdningsapparater
pl: Akcesoria do sprzętu AGD
pt: Acessórios para eletrodomésticos
ru: Принадлежности для бытовых приборов
sv: Tillbehör till hushållsapparater
tr: Ev Aleti Aksesuarları

en: Air Conditioner Accessories
xx: Air Conditioner Accessories
cs: Klimatizace – příslušenství
da: Aircondition – tilbehør
de: Klimaanlagen-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para el aire acondicionado
fr: Accessoires pour climatiseurs
it: Accessori per condizionatori
ja: エアコン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor airconditioning
no: Tilbehør til klimaanlegg
pl: Akcesoria do klimatyzatorów
pt: Acessórios para ar condicionado
ru: Принадлежности для кондиционеров
sv: Tillbehör till luftkonditionering
tr: Klima Aksesuarları

en: Air Conditioner Covers
xx: Air Conditioner Covers
cs: Kryty klimatizací
da: Aircondition – covers
de: Abdeckungen für Klimaanlagen
es: Cubiertas para aire acondicionado
fr: Protections pour climatiseurs
it: Coperture per condizionatori
ja: エアコン室外機カバー
nl: Afdekhoezen voor airconditioners
no: Deksler til klimaanlegg
pl: Osłony do klimatyzatorów
pt: Protetores de ar-condicionado
ru: Чехлы для кондиционеров
sv: Höljen för luftkonditionering
tr: Klima Motoru Muhafazaları

en: Air Conditioner Filters
xx: Air Conditioner Filters
cs: Filtry do klimatizací
da: Aircondition – filtre
de: Klimaanlagenfilter
es: Filtros de aire acondicionado
fr: Filtres pour climatiseurs
it: Filtri per condizionatori
ja: エアコンフィルター
nl: Airconditioningfilters
no: Filtre til klimaanlegg
pl: Filtry do klimatyzatorów
pt: Filtros de ar condicionado
ru: Фильтры для кондиционеров
sv: Luftkonditioneringsfilter
tr: Klima Filtreleri

en: Air Purifier Accessories
xx: Air Purifier Accessories
cs: Čističky vzduchu – příslušenství
da: Luftrensere – tilbehør
de: Luftreinigerzubehör
es: Accesorios para purificadores de aire
fr: Accessoires pour purificateurs d'air
it: Accessori purificatori d'aria
ja: 空気清浄機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor luchtzuivering
no: Tilbehør til luftrensere
pl: Akcesoria do oczyszczaczy powietrza
pt: Acessórios para purificadores de ar
ru: Принадлежности для воздухоочистителей
sv: Tillbehör till luftrenare
tr: Hava Arıtıcı Aksesuarları

en: Air Purifier Filters
xx: Air Purifier Filters
cs: Filtry do čističek vzduchu
da: Luftrensere – filtre
de: Luftreinigerfilter
es: Filtros purificadores de aire
fr: Filtres pour purificateurs d'air
it: Filtri purificatori d'aria
ja: 空気清浄機フィルター
nl: Luchtzuiveringsfilters
no: Filtre til luftrensere
pl: Filtry do oczyszczaczy powietrza
pt: Filtros de purificadores de ar
ru: Фильтры для воздухоочистителей
sv: Filter till luftfuktare
tr: Hava Arıtıcı Filtreleri

en: Dehumidifier Accessories
xx: Dehumidifier Accessories
cs: Odvlhčovače – příslušenství
da: Fugtfjerner – tilbehør
de: Entfeuchterzubehör
es: Accesorios deshumificadores
fr: Accessoires pour déshumidificateurs
it: Accessori deumidificatori
ja: 除湿器関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor ontvochtigers
no: Tilbehør til avfuktingsapparater
pl: Akcesoria do osuszaczy
pt: Acessórios para desumidificadores
ru: Принадлежности для осушителей воздуха
sv: Tillbehör till avfuktningsapparater
tr: Nem Giderici Aksesuarları

en: Fan Accessories
xx: Fan Accessories
cs: Větráky – příslušenství
da: Blæser – tilbehør
de: Ventilatorenzubehör
es: Accesorios para ventiladores
fr: Accessoires pour ventilateurs
it: Accessori ventola
ja: 扇風機・ファン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor ventilatoren
no: Viftetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do wentylatorów
pt: Acessórios para ventilador
ru: Принадлежности для вентиляторов
sv: Fläkttillbehör
tr: Vantilatör Aksesuarları

en: Floor & Steam Cleaner Accessories
xx: Floor & Steam Cleaner Accessories
cs: Čističe podlah a parní čističe – příslušenství
da: Tæppe- og damprensere – tilbehør
de: Teppich- & Dampfreinigerzubehör
es: Accesorios de limpiadores de vapor y de alfombras
fr: Accessoires pour nettoyeurs de sols et vapeur
it: Accessori battitappeto e pulitori a vapore
ja: カーペット用スチームクリーナー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor vloerbedekkings- en stoomreinigers
no: Tilbehør til teppe- og damprensere
pl: Akcesoria do czyszczenia dywanów i myjek parowych
pt: Acessórios para carpetes e limpadores a vapor
ru: Принадлежности для пылесосов и пароочистителей
sv: Tillbehör till maskiner för mattvätt och ångrengöring
tr: Zemin Temizleyici ve Buharlı Temizleyici Aksesuarları

en: Furnace & Boiler Accessories
xx: Furnace & Boiler Accessories
cs: Kotle – příslušenství
da: Fyr og kedler – tilbehør
de: Heizkessel- & Boilerzubehör
es: Accesorios para calderas y calentadores
fr: Accessoires pour chaudières
it: Accessori per fornaci e caldaie
ja: ボイラー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor ovens en boilers
no: Tilbehør til fyr og varmtvann
pl: Akcesoria do pieców i podgrzewaczy
pt: Acessórios para fornalhas e caldeiras
ru: Принадлежности для топок и котлов
sv: Tillbehör till elpannor och värmepannor
tr: Ocak ve Kazan Aksesuarları

en: Heating Radiator Accessories
xx: Heating Radiator Accessories
cs: Topná tělesa – příslušenství
da: Radiator – tilbehør
de: Heizkörperzubehör
es: Accesorios para radiadores de calefacción
fr: Accessoires pour radiateurs
it: Accessori per termosifoni
ja: オイルヒーター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor radiators
no: Tilbehør til radiatorer
pl: Akcesoria do kaloryferów
pt: Acessórios para aquecedores
ru: Принадлежности для радиаторов отопления
sv: Tillbehör till värmeelement
tr: Kalorifer Aksesuarları

en: Heating Radiator Reflectors
xx: Heating Radiator Reflectors
cs: Reflexní fólie k topným tělesům
da: Radiator – reflektorer
de: Heizkörperreflexionsfolie
es: Reflectores para radiadores de calefacción
fr: Réflecteurs pour radiateurs
it: Pannelli riflettenti per termosifoni
ja: オイルヒーター用反射板
nl: Radiatorreflectors
no: Reflektorer for radiatorer
pl: Folie odbijające ciepło
pt: Refletores para aquecedores
ru: Рефлекторы для радиаторов отопления
sv: Reflektorer för värmeelement
tr: Kalorifer Yansıtıcı Panelleri

en: Humidifier Accessories
xx: Humidifier Accessories
cs: Zvlhčovače – příslušenství
da: Vandfordamper – tilbehør
de: Luftbefeuchter-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para humidificadores
fr: Accessoires pour humidificateurs
it: Accessori umidificatori
ja: 加湿器関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor bevochtigers
no: Tilbehør til luftfuktere
pl: Akcesoria do nawilżaczy
pt: Acessórios de umidificadores
ru: Принадлежности для увлажнителей воздуха
sv: Tillbehör till luftfuktare
tr: Nemlendirici Aksesuarları

en: Humidifier Filters
xx: Humidifier Filters
cs: Filtry do zvlhčovačů
da: Vandfordamper – filtre
de: Luftbefeuchterfilter
es: Filtros de humidificadores
fr: Filtres pour humidificateurs
it: Filtri per umidificatori
ja: 加湿器用フィルター
nl: Bevochtigingsfilters
no: Filtre til luftfuktere
pl: Filtry do nawilżaczy
pt: Filtros de umidificadores
ru: Фильтры для увлажнителей воздуха
sv: Luftfuktarfilter
tr: Nemlendirici Filtreleri

en: Laundry Appliance Accessories
xx: Laundry Appliance Accessories
cs: Prádelní zařízení – příslušenství
da: Vasketøj – tilbehør
de: Wasch-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para electrodomésticos de lavandería
fr: Accessoires pour appareils de blanchisserie
it: Accessori lavatrici e asciugatrici
ja: ランドリー家電関連用品
nl: Wasmachine-accessoires
no: Tilbehør til klesvask-apparater
pl: Akcesoria do prania
pt: Acessórios para aparelhos de lavanderia
ru: Принадлежности для стирального оборудования
sv: Tillbehör till maskiner för tvätt och strykning
tr: Çamaşırhane Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Garment Steamer Accessories
xx: Garment Steamer Accessories
cs: Parní žehličky – příslušenství
da: Tøjdamper – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Dampfmaschinen
es: Accesorios de vaporizadores para ropa
fr: Accessoires pour défroisseurs à vapeur
it: Accessori ferri da stiro a vapore
ja: ガーメントスチーマー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kledingstomers
no: Tilbehør til kles-dampapparat
pl: Akcesoria do żelazek parowych
pt: Acessórios para vaporizador de roupas
ru: Принадлежности для пароочистителей для одежды
sv: Tillbehör för ångning av kläder
tr: Buharlı Elbise Temizleyici Aksesuarları